Utah statutes.
78B-6-113.   Prospective parent not a resident -- Preplacement requirements.
(1)  When an adoption petition is to be finalized in this state with regard to
any prospective adoptive parent who is not a resident of this state at the
time a child is placed in that person's home, the potential adoptive parent
shall:
(a)  comply with the provisions of Sections 78B-6-128 and 78B-6-130; and
(b) (i)  if the child is in state custody:
(A)  submit fingerprints for a Federal Bureau of Investigation national
criminal history record check through the Criminal and Technical Services
Division of the Department of Public Safety in accordance with the provisions
of Section 62A-2-120; or
(B)  submit to a fingerprint based Federal Bureau of Investigation national
criminal history record check through a law enforcement agency in another
state, district, or territory of the United States; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (2), if the child is not in state custody:
(A)  submit fingerprints for a Federal Bureau of Investigation national
criminal history records check as a personal records check; or
(B)  complete a criminal records check and child abuse database check for each
state and, if available, country, where the potential adoptive parent resided
during the five years immediately preceding the day on which the adoption
petition is to be finalized.
(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(b)(ii):
(a)  if the adoption is being handled by a human services program, as defined
in Section 62A-2-101:
(i)  the criminal history check described in Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(A) shall be
submitted in accordance with procedures established by the Criminal
Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public
Safety; and
(ii)  subject to Subsection (3), the criminal history check described in
Subsection (1)(b)(ii)(B) shall be submitted in a manner acceptable to the
court that will:
(A)  preserve the chain of custody of the results; and
(B)  not permit tampering with the results by a prospective adoptive parent or
other interested party; and
(b)  if the adoption is being handled by a private attorney, and not a human
services program, the criminal history checks described in Subsection
(1)(b)(ii), shall be:
(i)  submitted in accordance with procedures established by the Criminal
Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of Public
Safety; or
(ii)  subject to Subsection (3), submitted in a manner acceptable to the court
that will:
(A)  preserve the chain of custody of the results; and
(B)  not permit tampering with the results by a prospective adoptive parent or
other interested party.
(3)  In order to comply with Subsection (2)(a)(ii) or (b)(ii), the manner in
which the criminal history check is submitted shall be approved by the court.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection 78B-6-131(2), in addition to the other
requirements of this section, before a child in state custody is placed with a
prospective foster parent or a prospective adoptive parent, the Department of
Human Services shall comply with Section 78B-6-131.
